Illinois, session 104th, HB2792.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5adding Section 2.26 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2.26 new)7    Sec. 2.26. Requester verification. If a public body uses 8an electronic system for the submission of requests under this 9Act, then it shall employ a CAPTCHA test or other similar 10measures to verify that those electronically submitted 11requests are being made by a human.